Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 2 Transportation of Livestock and Domestic Animals by Common Carriers

Editor’s notes.

This part consisted of Code Sections 46-9-70 through 46-9-72 and was based on Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 167, §§ 1 through 3; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2313 through 2315; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2767 through 2769; Code 1933, §§ 18-302 through 18-304.

46-9-70 through 46-9-72.
[Reserved]

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 1996, p. 950, § 7, effective April 15, 1996.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 950, § 7 repealed and reserved this article, effective April 15, 1996.